Hawaii statutes.
[PART VIII.
IMMUNIZATION REGISTRY]

§325-121 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Health care provider" means a
program, agency, clinic, health care center, physician licensed under the
provisions of chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurse licensed under
the provisions of chapter 457, pharmacist licensed under the provisions of
chapter 461, physician's assistant licensed under the provisions of chapter
453, person authorized to practice medicine as a physician or physician's
assistant, or nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse, in federal
facilities located in the State, that administers immunizations in Hawaii, or
any other person authorized to prescribe vaccinations in Hawaii.

"Health organization" means a health
insurance company, fraternal benefit society governed by article 2 of chapter
432, mutual benefit society governed by article 1 of chapter 432, health care
service plan or health maintenance organization governed by chapter 432D, or
any other entity delivering or issuing for delivery in the State accident and
health or sickness insurance as defined in section 431:1-205.

"Immunization assessment report" means
any registry-produced report designed to provide a detailed listing of the
immunizations an individual has received as well as immunizations that are
currently due or overdue. Immunization assessment reports may also include
aggregate reports produced to monitor and improve the health of a specific
population or public health in general.

"Post-secondary school" means any
adult education school, business school, trade school, community college,
college, or university enrolling or registering students above the age of
compulsory attendance.

"Registry" means the Hawaii
immunization registry.

"School" means any child care center,
preschool, day care center, day nursery, head start program, group child care
home, kindergarten, elementary, intermediate, middle, or secondary school that
is responsible for ensuring student compliance with mandatory school
immunization entrance requirements.

"Student" means any child or adult
enrolled in any school or post-secondary school in the State. [L 2010, c 113,
pt of §1; am L 2012, c 275, §1; am L 2015, c 35, §42]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next